Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2033
Osteopathic physician; license; scope.

(1) With respect to licenses issued pursuant to sections 38-2031 and 38-2032 and any renewals thereof, the department shall designate the extent of such practice as follows:

(a) License to practice as an osteopathic physician; or

(b) License to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery.

(2) Every license issued under sections 38-2031 and 38-2032 shall confer upon the holder thereof the right to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery as taught in the schools or colleges of osteopathic medicine recognized by the American Osteopathic Association in the manner and to the extent provided by such license.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 119, p. 490;

C.S.1929, § 71-1705;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,141;

Laws 1969, c. 565, § 5, p. 2302;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 26;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 446;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,141;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 343;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 691.

The practice of obstetrics and the use of anaesthetics, though not within the definition of osteopathy, has by legislative action been included within the scope of the license to practice osteopathy. State ex rel. Johnson v. Wagner, 139 Neb. 471, 297 N.W. 906 (1941).